Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.110

Actions against licenses—Grounds—Duration.

(1) In cases other than those relating to the failure of a licensee to renew a license, the director may suspend or revoke a license issued pursuant to this chapter for any of the following reasons:

(a) For fraud or deception in obtaining the license;

(b) For fraud or deception in reporting under RCW 18.104.050;

(c) For violating the provisions of this chapter, or of any lawful rule or regulation of the department or the department of health.

(2) The director shall immediately suspend any license issued under this chapter if the holder of the license has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a *residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(3) No license shall be suspended for more than six months, except that a suspension under RCW 74.20A.320 shall continue until the department receives a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(4) No person whose license is revoked shall be eligible to apply for a license for one year from the effective date of the final order of revocation.

[ 1997 c 58 s 828; 1993 c 387 s 18; 1991 c 3 s 251; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.